Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.900

Repeal and saving.

All acts or parts of acts inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter may be and the same are hereby repealed: PROVIDED, This chapter shall not repeal the provisions of the vital statistics laws of the state, but shall be deemed as additional and cumulative provisions.

[ 1917 c 160 s 10.]